hr_HR.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY aionerjmtsulkpvdzAgčcbšhćžfEMđGCILHDJSKPBŠTVČNRFOZŽWyUĐxwYĆQqX

SFX A Y 13
SFX A 0 a [^aeiou]
SFX A 0 u [^aeiou]
SFX A 0 e [^aeiou]
SFX A 0 om [^aeiou]
SFX A a e a
SFX A a i a
SFX A a om a
SFX A o a o
SFX A o u o
SFX A o om o
SFX A e a e
SFX A e u e
SFX A e em e


SFX B Y 5
SFX B ti m ti
SFX B ti š ti
SFX B ti mo ti
SFX B ti te ti
SFX B ti u ti

SFX C Y 4
SFX C ti h ti
SFX C ti smo ti
SFX C ti ste ti
SFX C ti še ti

SFX D Y 5
SFX D ti h ti
SFX D ti še ti
SFX D ti smo ti
SFX D ti ste ti
SFX D ti hu ti

SFX E Y 3
SFX E ti o ti
SFX E ti li ti
SFX E ti la ti



SFX F Y 5
SFX F ti h ti
SFX F ti še ti
SFX F ti smo ti
SFX F ti ste ti
SFX F iti hu ti

SFX G Y 5
SFX G ti m ti
SFX G ti š ti
SFX G ti mo ti
SFX G ti te ti
SFX G iti e iti



SFX H Y 6
SFX H 0 a .
SFX H 0 u .
SFX H 0 i .
SFX H 0 ih .
SFX H 0 im .
SFX H 0 e .

SFX I Y 6
SFX I 0 a .
SFX I 0 u .
SFX I 0 i .
SFX I 0 ih .
SFX I 0 ima . 
SFX I 0 e .

SFX J Y 6
SFX J 0 a .
SFX J 0 u .
SFX J 0 i .
SFX J 0 ih .
SFX J 0 im .
SFX J 0 o .


SFX K Y 6
SFX K 0 a .
SFX K 0 u .
SFX K 0 i .
SFX K 0 ih .
SFX K 0 ima .
SFX K 0 o .


SFX L Y 2
SFX L 0 oj .
SFX L 0 om .

SFX M Y 4
SFX M a e a
SFX M a i a
SFX M a o a
SFX M a u a
