hr_HR.dic
alocirati/DGCE
ambulantna/A
anodna/AM
aplicirati/EGCD
arhaična/A
asocirati/DGEC
bankrotirati/CEGD
basirati/EDGC
baština/MA
batinati/GECD
Berna/A
bezglav/AHIJL
bistra/AM
blag/HAIJL
blještav/AJIHL
bogatati/GECD
boljitka/A
brbljav/AHLI
bređati/CEGD
brica/MA
brstiti/GE
brzojav/HAI
bubnjati/EGCD
čaša/MA
čavlića/A
ćelav/AHIL
čest/HAIJL
čihati/CGDE
ciljati/CDEG
čipkast/HLAI
čistka/MA
čitati/EGCD
coprati/ECGD
crven/AHLIJ
čuperka/A
dalek/AJHIL
deformacija/AM
dekorirati/EGCD
demaskirati/EDCG
deprimiran/JAHIL
deran/LHAI
deregulirati/GEC
derogirati/ECG
dezinformirati/CEGD
dijaloška/A
dioničar/IA
divaniti/GE
divljina/MA
docirati/DECG
dodijati/CEG
dodijeliti/ECG
donos/HAI
donositi/EG
dopisnik/AL
dopustiv/AHIJL
dospijevati/CGED
dostojanstven/HAIJL
dovoljna/MA
dovršavati/DGCE
doživljavati/GECD
drag/HLAIJ
drmati/ECDG
dubok/ALHIJ
duhovit/JAHLI
dvojben/HLIAJ
dvojnica/MA
edenska/A
ekonomist/ALI
emancipirati/CDGE
enciklopedija/MA
evoluirati/GCED
farmacija/A
folklorna/MA
fotografirati/ECDG
frazirati/CEGD
gerilka/AM
glasovit/HLAJI
glavica/MA
glinen/HALI
glumiti/GE
gnjil/HAJLI
gombati/EGCD
gonjen/HLIA
gorčati/EGCD
grabov/AHIL
građen/HAIJL
grafička/AM
granati/DECG
grčenja/A
gr/L
gust/AHLIJ
halapljiv/AILHJ
harati/GECD
harmonija/M
harpun/LA
hodati/GECD
hodočastiti/GE
holokaust/A
hrom/HIAJL
huškač/HAI
igla/MA
imenovan/AHIL
indisponiran/AIJLH
infiltrirati/DCEG
inkomodirati/ECDG
integriranja/A
intenzivirati/CDEG
invalidnina/MA
ionizirati/ECGD
iscrpljen/AHJIL
iskašljavati/DCGE
iskorijeniti/EGC
ispaliti/EGC
išpartati/EGC
ispravljen/HLAI
ispumpati/CEG
istaknut/AHJLI
istovar/AHI
istucati/EGC
isturen/AHIL
iterativna/A
izbezumiti/EGC
izgibati/CDEG
izgrditi/CGE
izgubljen/HIAJL
izjednačavati/ECGD
izmiješan/AHLI
izmlatiti/GEC
izmožden/AHJIL
izolacijska/MA
izostaviti/EGC
izredati/ECG
izvještačen/AJLHI
izvoz/AHI
izvršavati/DGCE
jadnija/A
jak/HLAJI
jasmin/AIL
jecati/CEGD
jelovina/AM
junačiti/GE
kaljati/CGED
kaljav/HAJLI
kamiš/AI
kantonizacija/A
karika/AM
kariran/HAIJL
kastriran/HALI
kirurg/AL
kladionica/MA
klasati/CDEG
klizač/AI
klonirati/EGCD
klupčasta/A
knjižar/IKA
kolosalna/MA
komentator/AL
kompenzirati/EDCG
komplicirati/GDEC
kontejner/AIL
kontinuiran/HIJLA
kontrašpijunaža/MA
konvertirati/GCED
kopča/AM
kopirati/CEGD
koračati/EGCD
koral/AL
koščat/AIJHL
kozmos/IHA
kravar/AL
kreditna/AM
krijumčar/AHI
krivovjerca/A
krvav/AHLIJ
krvaviti/EG
kućevlasnik/AL
kuglati/EDGC
kuhala/MA
kukast/HAJLI
kukurikati/EGDC
kultivirati/EGDC
lakiran/HIAL
lanen/AJHIL
latinica/MA
lavina/MA
leopard/AHI
lijep/HILAJ
lišiti/EGC
ljeskati/ECGD
lješnjak/AL
ljubomora/MA
lud/HLAJI
lugarova/A
lukin/ALHI
maj/AL
majur/AKIL
maksimalna/MA
manikirati/CGED
manjkav/AHJIL
materijalizirati/CDEG
meden/AHLI
međuigra/MA
međustrukovna/A
miješati/EDCG
milostiv/HJAIL
mimoilaziti/GE
mjeden/AHIL
mladenačka/MA
mnogostran/AHJIL
mogila/A
mršav/AJHIL
mućkati/ECDG
muha/MA
nabavljati/EGDC
nabrojan/AIHL
načičkati/EGC
način/AHI
naćuliti/CE
nagib/A
nagluh/AHIJL
nagrditi/EGC
naklanjati/EGC
nakloniti/EGC
naljut/AHIL
naočarka/AM
napadati/EGCD
napet/AHJLI
napipati/CGE
napisan/AILH
narediti/EGC
narugati/EGC
nastanjen/AHJIL
nastran/AHJIL
natmuriti/CGE
naviknut/AIHL
navršiti/EGC
neartikuliran/ILAHJ
nedopustiv/AHLJI
nedostiživ/AHIL
nedostižna/MA
neimenovanja/A
neiskazan/IAHL
neisplaćen/HIJLA
neispunjen/HILAJ
neizreciv/IAJLH
nekuhan/AHJLI
nemoguć/AHIL
neobavljen/AIHL
neodrživ/AJHIL
neopravdan/HLAIJ
neoštećen/AHLI
neovlašten/HAILJ
neplaćen/AHLI
nepogoda/MA
nepomućen/AHIL
nepotpun/AHJIL
neprilagođen/AJHLI
nepromočiv/ALHJI
neranjiv/AJHLI
nerazumljiv/AJHIL
nervirati/CEGD
nesavladiv/ALJHI
neselektivna/MA
neškolovan/AHLJI
nesreća/MA
nesređen/IHJAL
nestrpljiv/HILAJ
neučtiv/HAIJL
neupućen/AJHIL
neusiljen/HLIAJ
nevin/HIJLA
nezanimljiv/AHJIL
nezapaljiv/AHJIL
nizvodna/MA
njen/AHIL
njuškati/ECDG
numerička/MA
obasjavati/CGED
obazriv/JAHIL
objediniti/CEG
obljubljen/AJHLI
obojen/AHLIJ
oboriti/EGC
obratiti/GEC
obrazovan/AILH
obrušavati/CGDE
obrva/AM
obvezan/AHLI
ocrniti/EC
odjaviti/CEG
odjeven/HIAL
odlikaša/A
određen/HJLAI
odred/HAI
odrubiti/EC
odsijevati/DCEG
odstup/HAI
odvažiti/GEC
oglašavati/ECGD
ojačati/EGC
okrpiti/EC
okušan/HAIJL
oličen/AHIL
omama/MA
omogućivanja/A
omraziti/CEG
onesposobiti/GEC
on/HIAL
opadati/EGDC
opak/HLAJI
opkopati/EGC
oprostiv/IAHL
opunomoćen/HLAI
orguljati/CEGD
oročiti/GEC
osam/AJH
osamljen/HIAJL
osiromašiti/EGC
oslobađati/GECD
osnovna/MA
osovinska/MA
osvijetljen/AHIL
osvjedočiti/CGE
otjerati/CGE
otkidati/EGCD
otpust/HAI
otrcan/HAIJL
ovlašten/IAJLH
ovlažiti/ECG
oživljavati/CDEG
paktirati/EGCD
palucati/CDEG
panslavenska/A
parlamentarna/MA
patvoren/HILJA
petnaest/HIJLA
pimplati/EGCD
pipeta/A
piskutati/GEDC
pismen/AHIJL
pjena/AM
planinariti/EG
plinovit/AHJLI
pobratim/AHIJ
pocrkati/CEG
podbočen/IALH
poderan/ALJHI
podesiti/EC
podivljavati/CGED
podneska/A
podrivati/ECGD
podvala/MA
pogledati/GCDE
pohoditi/CEG
pojačan/HLAJI
poklanjati/CDEG
poklapati/EGCD
pokriven/ALHJI
pokunjen/JHLAI
pokvariti/GCE
polomiti/ECG
položen/AILHJ
polutrajna/A
ponjava/MA
pooštriti/GCE
poplaviti/GCE
popust/AHI
poraditi/EC
porušen/HIAL
pospremiti/EGC
postav/AHJI
postavljati/GCED
postignut/AHLI
poštivati/CD
pošumljen/AHIL
posvaditi/ECG
potkrijepljen/AHLI
potražnja/AM
potrgan/JLHIA
poudati/GCE
povremen/IAHJL
pozajmiti/EGC
pozdraviti/CEG
prastar/AHIL
prazna/MA
prebačen/AHIL
precrtana/A
predbilježiti/CEG
predsjedavati/EGDC
pregrizati/ECGD
prehraniti/CGE
preinačen/AHLI
prelistati/GEC
prepisati/C
preplaviti/ECG
prepoznatljiv/HALI
preprodavati/DGEC
prepun/JAHIL
prešati/ECDG
prestravljen/HAIL
presušila/A
pretplatnička/MA
pretpostavljati/DCGE
preudavati/ECDG
prevoziti/EG
pribijati/EGCD
pridodan/AHLI
prigovoriti/GCE
prihvaćen/HIAL
prijetiti/EG
prikazan/AIJHL
prikriven/HAJLI
prikrmiti/EC
pripovijedana/A
pripremljen/JAHLI
priručnik/LA
prišivati/CEGD
prisjećati/EGCD
pristran/AIHJL
pristupačna/MA
pritajiti/EGC
privlačiv/AJHIL
produkt/IA
profilirati/EGCD
prognozirati/DECG
progurati/EGC
prokopavati/DGCE
promaknuća/A
promišljen/ALHIJ
promočiv/AJHLI
propisan/LAHJI
propjevati/EGC
prosječna/MA
prosperirati/EGCD
proždrljiv/AHIJL
prsiti/GE
prtljati/GECD
pružati/ECDG
pubertet/A
pust/HAIJL
puten/AILHJ
rabiti/GE
ran/HAJLI
rasplamsati/ECG
raspojasan/JAHIL
raspredati/EGCD
rasprodan/HILAJ
raspucati/CEG
rasterećenja/A
rasut/IAHL
ravnodušna/MA
razabrati/CE
razapet/IAHLJ
razdijeliti/CGE
razgovorljiv/HIAJL
razmetljiv/IHAJL
razmijeniti/CGE
razrješavati/CGED
razumijevati/CGDE
razvijen/AJIHL
razvrstan/AHLIJ
reflektirajuća/A
reflektor/AI
rekonstruirati/GECD
remen/AHILJ
repatrirati/ECGD
restaurator/AIL
rezimirati/EGCD
rovanja/A
rubna/AM
rupičav/AHILJ
rvati/DGEC
sabran/AHIJL
saditi/EG
sam/HAJLI
savjetovanja/A
sažaliti/GCE
sedamnaest/HAJLI
sekirati/EGCD
seliti/EG
šepav/AHIJL
šibati/CDEG
silazna/AM
sjećanja/A
skicirati/CEGD
sklop/HLAI
školovan/AHIL
skopčati/CEG
skraćen/HJAIL
skrpati/EGC
skupocjen/AHLIJ
sluškinja/MA
sluzav/JAHIL
smiren/HALIJ
smisliti/EGC
snižavati/ECDG
sniziti/ECG
solidarizirati/CEDG
spust/AH
sračunat/AHLI
srebrn/JAHIL
sređen/HAIJL
staklen/AIJLH
stanjiti/CEG
stapati/CEGD
starati/DGCE
staroslavenska/MA
strahovati/E
streljana/MA
stvor/AH
suočavati/EGCD
suočiti/GEC
surfati/CGED
suša/MA
sušen/LAHJI
sveščića/A
svjež/HALJI
svoj/AHIL
tašt/ALHIJ
tematizirati/EGCD
terorizirati/EGDC
težačka/AM
tigrica/A
tiskati/DCGE
transportirati/GCDE
tretirati/CEGD
tronut/JAHIL
trošenja/A
trostruk/HAIJL
tumarati/EGDC
turpija/AM
uglat/AHIJL
ugledati/EGCD
ugljen/AJHLI
ugušiti/GCE
uhapsiti/ECG
ukočen/AJHIL
ukrašavanja/A
ukrašavati/EGDC
umiljat/JAHIL
umiriti/GCE
upaljen/JAHIL
upropastiti/CEG
upuštati/ECDG
urod/AIH
ušećeriti/CEG
ušivati/ECDG
uskrsnuća/A
usvojen/JLAHI
utovar/HAI
uvaliti/CEG
uviđati/CEGD
uzburkan/AHILJ
uzgredna/AM
uzvraćati/GDEC
valovit/AHIJL
varikina/A
varirati/CDGE
vođen/LAHJI
voditeljica/A
vožnja/MA
vraćen/LAHI
vrludati/CDGE
vunen/AHJIL
zabrljati/CEG
zagalamiti/EC
zagušljiv/IHAJL
zaključka/A
zakloniti/CEG
zamarati/CEGD
zamatati/EGCD
zapažati/GCED
zapetljan/AHIL
zapušten/ALHIJ
zaručen/ALHIJ
zaslijepiti/EGC
zataškati/EGC
zatisnuta/A
zavijati/CDGE
zbuniti/CEG
zdravstven/AHJLI
zeka/MA
žongler/A
žut/AHLIJ
zvjezdan/HIAL
